Hawaii statutes.
§4-3 Districts include archipelagic waters,
etc. Each of the districts includes archipelagic waters and smaller
islands adjacent thereto. [L 1909, c 84, §2; RL 1925, §145; RL 1935, §7621; RL
1945, §152; RL 1955, §10-2; HRS §4-3; am L 1980, c 163, §2]

Cross References

Territorial waters, see note to Const. art. XV, §1.

Case Notes

As each of the districts on the island of Oahu includes
archipelagic waters and smaller islands adjacent thereto under this section,
where the two dog attacks occurred in shallow water, very close to the
shoreline of an Oahu beach, the attacks clearly took place within the waters
and archipelagic waters adjacent to the island of Oahu and thus within the city's
territorial limits; therefore, the city had the authority to enforce the
violations of Revised Ordinances of Honolulu §7-7.2 that defendant was charged
with committing, which makes it a crime for a dog owner to negligently fail to
control a dangerous dog. 120 H. 486 (App.), 210 P.3d 9 (2009).

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next